District of Columbia statutes.
3-205

Bodies to be used in District; duty of persons receiving bodies; disposal of remains.

It shall be the duty of each and every officer, agent, and employee of every school and board receiving bodies under the provisions of this chapter to see that such bodies are used in the District of Columbia and for the promotion of the medical, dental, or mortuary sciences, and for no other purpose whatsoever, and that after being so used the remains thereof are disposed of in accordance with law.

History

Apr. 29, 1902, 32 Stat. 174, ch. 638, § 5
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-199,§ 8(c), 30 DCR 119

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1405.
1973 Ed., § 2-205.